District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.13

Member’s liability for dues, assessments, and fees.

(a)

A membership corporation may levy dues, assessments, and fees on its members to the extent authorized in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. Dues, assessments, and fees may be imposed on members of the same class either alike or in different amounts or proportions, and may be imposed on a different basis on different classes of members. Members of a class may be made exempt from dues, assessments, and fees to the extent provided in the articles or bylaws.

(b)

The amount and method of collection of dues, assessments, and fees may be fixed in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or the articles or bylaws may authorize the board of directors or members to fix the amount and method of collection.

(c)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide reasonable means, such as termination and reinstatement of membership, to enforce the collection of dues, assessments, and fees.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-408.22.